Tennessee, session 114, HB1029.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-35-505, is amended by deleting
"education, employment" and substituting "education, housing, employment".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1029
003022
- 1 -